Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1669.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 41A.30, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Allocation limits. (a) For tax credits allowed under subdivision 2, the commissioner must not issue credit certificates for more than: (1) $7,400,000 for fiscal year 2025; and (2) deleted text begin $2,100,000deleted text end new text begin $10,000,000new text end for deleted text begin each ofdeleted text end fiscal years 2026 deleted text begin and 2027deleted text end new text begin to 2029new text end . (b) If the entire amount authorized under paragraph (a) is not allocated in fiscal deleted text begin yeardeleted text end new text begin yearsnew text end 2025 deleted text begin or 2026deleted text end new text begin to 2029new text end , any remaining amount is available for allocation through fiscal year 2030 until the entire allocation has been made. The commissioner must not issue any credit certificates for fiscal years beginning after June 30, 2030, and any unallocated amounts cancel on that date. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end